Utah statutes.
7-1-505.   Rules and regulations governing persons or institutions not
regulated under other chapters of title.
With respect to any person or institution or class of institutions subject to
the jurisdiction of the department under this part and not regulated or
supervised under any other chapter of this title, the commissioner shall issue
appropriate rules and regulations consistent with the purposes and provisions
of this title governing the regulation, supervision, and examination of those
persons, institutions, or classes of institutions.
